Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.090

Compliance with administrative procedures, requirements—Display of license—Continuing education, competency standards.

Each person who engages in practice under this chapter shall comply with administrative procedures and administrative requirements established under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 and shall keep the license or interim permit conspicuously posted in the place of business at all times. The secretary may establish mandatory continuing education requirements and/or continued competency standards to be met by licensees or interim permit holders as a condition for license or interim permit renewal.

[ 2002 c 310 s 8; 1998 c 142 s 5; 1997 c 275 s 5. Prior: 1996 c 200 s 11; 1996 c 191 s 21; 1991 c 3 s 84; 1989 c 198 s 5; 1985 c 7 s 33; 1983 c 39 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.